Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6141
Enforcement.

Whenever it appears to the director that any person or any director, officer, employee, or agent of the person has committed or is about to commit a violation of the Mutual Insurance Holding Company Act or of any rule, regulation, or order of the director, the director may apply to the district court of Lancaster County for an order enjoining such person, director, officer, employee, or agent from violating or continuing to violate the act or any such rule, regulation, or order and for such other equitable relief as the nature of the case and the interest of the insurer's policyholders, creditors, and shareholders or the public may require.

Laws 1997, LB 740, § 20.